Arkansas, session 2025, SB77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Physical therapy in clinic-based setting — Findings.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program covers physical therapy to
help beneficiaries improve their movement and physical function, manage pain
and other chronic conditions, and recover from or prevent injury and chronic
disease;
(2) However, the program reimburses for physical therapy only in
a hospital-based setting;
(3) Research has found that access to rehabilitative physical
therapy in clinic-based settings leads to lower total costs of care over
time, decreases the need for surgical interventions, and reduces the need for
long-term use of opioids and other pain medications; and
(4) Expanding coverage for rehabilitative physical therapy in
clinic-based settings under the program would result in cost savings to the
*JMB074*
02-03-2025 10:39:08 JMB074

As Engrossed: S2/3/25 SB77
program.
(b) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall reimburse for physical therapy
provided in a clinic-based setting.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.

/s/M. Johnson




























02-03-2025 10:39:08 JMB074